Washington statutes.
RCW 24.12.055

Failure to file annual report—Reinstatement after administrative dissolution.

(1) The secretary of state shall, when exigent or mitigating circumstances are presented, reinstate to full active status any corporation sole previously in good standing that would otherwise be penalized or lose its active status. Any corporation sole desiring to seek relief under this section shall, within five years of the missed filing or lapse, notify the secretary of state in writing. The notification must include the name and mailing address of the corporation sole, the corporate sole officer to whom correspondence should be sent, and a statement under oath by a responsible corporate sole officer, setting forth the nature of the missed filing or lapse, the circumstances of the missed filing or lapse, that disproportionate harm would occur to the corporation sole if relief were not granted, and the relief sought.

(2) Upon receipt of the notice under subsection (1) of this section, the secretary of state shall investigate the circumstances of the missed filing or lapse.

(a) If the secretary of state is satisfied that sufficient exigent or mitigating circumstances exist; that the corporation sole has demonstrated good faith and a reasonable attempt to comply with the applicable corporate sole license statutes of this state; that disproportionate harm would occur to the corporation sole if relief were not granted; and that relief would not be contrary to the public interest expressed in this title, the secretary may issue an order reinstating the corporation sole and specifying any terms and conditions of the relief. Reinstatement may relate back to the date of lapse or dissolution.

(b) If the secretary of state determines the request does not comply with the requirements for relief, the secretary shall issue an order denying the requested relief and stating the reasons for the denial. Any denial of relief by the secretary of state is final and is not appealable.

(c) The secretary of state shall keep records of all requests for relief and the disposition of the requests. The secretary of state shall annually report to the legislature the number of relief requests received in the preceding year and a summary of the secretary's disposition of the requests.

[ 2009 c 437 s 15.]